Illinois, session 104th, HB3116.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The University of Illinois Act is amended by 5changing Section 8 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 305/8)  (from Ch. 144, par. 29)7    Sec. 8. Admissions. 8    (a) (Blank).9    (b) No new student shall be admitted to instruction in any 10of the departments or colleges of the University unless such 11student also has satisfactorily completed:12        (1) at least 15 units of high school coursework from 13    the following 5 categories:14            (A) 4 years of English (emphasizing written and 15        oral communications and literature), of which up to 2 16        years may be collegiate level instruction;17            (B) 3 years of social studies (emphasizing history 18        and government);19            (C) 3 years of mathematics (introductory through 20        advanced algebra, geometry, trigonometry, or 21        fundamentals of computer programming);22            (D) 3 years of science (laboratory sciences or 23        agricultural sciences); and  HB3116- 2 -LRB104 10017 LNS 20088 b1            (E) 2 years of electives in foreign language 2        (which may be deemed to include American Sign 3        Language), music, career and technical education, 4        agricultural education, or art;5        (2) except that institutions may admit individual 6    applicants if the institution determines through 7    assessment or through evaluation based on learning 8    outcomes of the coursework taken, including career and 9    technical education courses and courses taken in a charter 10    school established under Article 27A of the School Code, 11    that the applicant demonstrates knowledge and skills 12    substantially equivalent to the knowledge and skills 13    expected to be acquired in the high school courses 14    required for admission. The Board of Trustees of the 15    University of Illinois shall not discriminate in the 16    University's admissions process against an applicant for 17    admission because of the applicant's enrollment in a 18    charter school established under Article 27A of the School 19    Code. Institutions may also admit 1) applicants who did 20    not have an opportunity to complete the minimum college 21    preparatory curriculum in high school, and 2) 22    educationally disadvantaged applicants who are admitted to 23    the formal organized special assistance programs that are 24    tailored to the needs of such students, providing that in 25    either case, the institution incorporates in the 26    applicant's baccalaureate curriculum courses or other   HB3116- 3 -LRB104 10017 LNS 20088 b1    academic activities that compensate for course 2    deficiencies; and3        (3) except that up to 3 of the 15 units of coursework 4    required by paragraph (1) of this subsection may be 5    distributed by deducting no more than one unit each from 6    the categories of social studies, mathematics, sciences 7    and electives and completing those 3 units in any of the 5 8    categories of coursework described in paragraph (1).9    (c) When allocating funds, local boards of education shall 10recognize their obligation to their students to offer the 11coursework required by subsection (b).12    (d) A student who has graduated from high school and has 13scored within the University's accepted range on the ACT or 14SAT shall not be required to take a high school equivalency 15test as a prerequisite to admission.16    (e) The Board of Trustees shall establish an admissions 17process in which honorably discharged veterans are permitted 18to submit an application for admission to the University as a 19freshman student enrolling in the spring semester if the 20veteran was on active duty during the fall semester. The 21University may request that the Department of Veterans' 22Affairs confirm the status of an applicant as an honorably 23discharged veteran who was on active duty during the fall 24semester.25    (f) Beginning with the 2025-2026 academic year, the 26University shall provide all Illinois students transferring   HB3116- 4 -LRB104 10017 LNS 20088 b1from a public community college in this State with the 2University's undergraduate transfer admissions application fee 3waiver policy and, if such a policy exists, any application or 4forms necessary to apply for a fee waiver as part of the 5University's transfer admissions process. The University is 6encouraged to develop a policy to automatically waive the 7undergraduate transfer admissions application fee for 8low-income Illinois students transferring from a public 9community college in this State. The University shall post 10this policy in an easily accessible place on the University's 11Internet website.12    (g) Beginning with the 2026-2027 academic year, the Board 13of Trustees shall give priority admission to residents of this 14State as follows: 15        (1) for the 2026-2027 academic year, 79% of the 16    University's freshman class of undergraduate students 17    shall be residents of this State; 18        (2) for the 2027-2028 academic year, 82.5% of the 19    University's freshman class of undergraduate students 20    shall be residents of this State; 21        (3) for the 2028-2029 academic year, 86.5% of the 22    University's freshman class of undergraduate students 23    shall be residents of this State; and 24        (4) for the 2029-2030 academic year and each academic 25    year thereafter, 90% of the University's freshman class of 26    undergraduate students shall be residents of this State.   HB3116- 5 -LRB104 10017 LNS 20088 b1(Source: P.A. 102-403, eff. 1-1-22; 102-404, eff. 1-1-22; 2103-936, eff. 8-9-24.) 3    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 4becoming law.